Missouri, session 2026, HB2784.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 217, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 217.446, to read as follows:
217.446. 1. When any person under fifty-five years of age dies within a
2 department of corrections facility, the Missouri state highway patrol shall conduct an
3 independent death investigation.
4 2. In conducting the investigation, the highway patrol shall be granted full access
5 to any records and findings of an autopsy conducted under section 217.412.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.